Louisiana, session 2026, HB32.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:224, 403(15), 405, 407, 444(A)(1)(a)(i) and (2)(b)(i)(bb) and
(C)(introductory paragraph), and 446(F) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§224. Restoration to active service
If any disability retiree of a state or statewide retirement system who is under
the age of sixty years for regular retirement is restored to active service, his
retirement allowance shall cease, he shall again become a member of the retirement
system, and he shall contribute thereafter at the current rate in effect at the time he
is restored to service, and if he contributes for at least three years, the period of time
on disability shall be counted as accredited service for purposes of establishing
retirement eligibility, but not for computation of benefits. Any prior service
certificate on which his service was computed at the time of his retirement shall be
restored to full force and effect and, in addition, upon his subsequent retirement he
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 32 ENROLLED
shall be credited with all his service as a member. This Section shall apply to all
disability retirees, regardless of the date they qualified for a disability retirement
benefit.
* * *
§403. Definitions
The following words and phrases used in this Chapter shall have the
following meanings, unless a different meaning is clearly required by the context:
* * *
(15) "Job appointment" means employment for a fixed period not to exceed
two years. a temporary appointment of an employee to fill a position for a period of
time as set forth in rules adopted by the State Civil Service Commission.
* * *
§405. Exemption from execution; exception
Any annuity, retirement allowance or benefit, or refund of contributions, or
any optional benefit or any other benefit paid or paid to any person under the
provisions of this Chapter is exempt from any state or municipal tax and is exempt
from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever,
except as provided in R.S. 11:292 and 293, and is unassignable.
* * *
§407. Correction of administrative error
Except as expressly provided otherwise in this Chapter, the director may,
upon written documentation that an administrative error has occurred in the
administration of this system, which documentation shall be submitted to the board
of trustees at the next board meeting, whether such administrative error was
committed by this system or otherwise, correct such administrative error and may
make all adjustments relative to such correction.
* * *
§444. Computation of retirement benefit
A.(1)(a)(i) A member who retires effective on or after July 1, 1973, shall
receive a maximum retirement allowance equal to two and one-half percent of
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 32 ENROLLED
average compensation, as determined under R.S. 11:231 pursuant to R.S. 11:403, for
every year of creditable service, plus three hundred dollars.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(b) Peace officers, as defined by R.S. 40:2402(3)(a), employed by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of state police, other than state
troopers, whose first employment making them eligible for membership in one of
the state systems occurred on or before December 31, 2010, shall receive a
maximum retirement allowance in accordance with the following:
(i)
* * *
(bb) Any person employed as a peace officer by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections as determined under R.S. 11:231, on or before June 30, 2006,
who was participating in the Deferred Retirement Option Plan on June 30, 2007, or
who had continued in employment as of such date after completion of plan
participation shall have his base benefit recalculated to reflect the increase in benefits
provided pursuant to Subitem (aa) of this Item. The balance in his plan account and
any subsequent contributions to such account shall be increased to reflect such
benefit increase.
* * *
C. The retirement benefit of any member of this system who is not a
qualified participant, as defined in Paragraph (B)(2) of this Section, when expressed
as an annual benefit may not exceed the lesser of either the annual benefit authorized
by Section 415(d) of the United States Internal Revenue Code or one hundred
percent of such member's average compensation for his highest three years or five
years as provided in R.S. 11:403. For purposes of determining whether a member's
benefit exceeds the limitations of this Subsection, the following shall apply:
* * *
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 32 ENROLLED
§446. Mode of payment where option elected
* * *
F. If the member is married, the designated beneficiary for a qualified joint
and survivor annuity and any Deferred Retirement Option Plan benefits payable in
accordance with law shall be his spouse, unless such spouse has consented to the
contrary in writing before a notary public, or such spouse cannot be located and the
member submits an original affidavit signed by him before a notary public which
evidences good faith efforts to locate the spouse. If the member does not select a
joint and survivor annuity option and fails to provide such a spousal consent at the
time of his retirement, then for the purposes of a retirement benefit option the system
shall establish the benefit as if the member had selected the Option 3 joint and
survivor annuity as provided in Paragraph (A)(3) of this Section. For purposes of
this Paragraph Subsection, "spouse" shall mean that person who is married to the
member under a legal regime of community of acquets and gains on his effective
date of retirement or effective date of participation in the Deferred Retirement
Option Plan, whichever is earlier.
* * *
Section 2. Any cost of this Act shall be funded by additional employer contributions
in compliance with article X, Section 29 (F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effect of
July 1, 2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.